qa/unittests/data/small/sk_SK.aff
SFX W Y 197
SFX W   ať          nem        čať
SFX W   ať          neš        čať
SFX W   ať          ne         čať
SFX W   ať          neme       čať
SFX W   ať          nete       čať
SFX W   ať          nú         čať
SFX W   ať          núc        čať
SFX W   ať          ni         čať
SFX W   ať          nime       čať
SFX W   ať          nite       čať
SFX W   edať        iem        edať
SFX W   edať        ieš        edať
SFX W   edať        ie         edať
SFX W   edať        ieme       edať
SFX W   edať        iete       edať
SFX W   edať        edia       edať
SFX W   edať        ediac      edať
SFX W   edať        edz        edať
SFX W   edať        edzme      edať
SFX W   edať        edzte      edať
SFX W   kať         čem        kať
SFX W   kať         češ        kať
SFX W   kať         če         kať
SFX W   kať         čeme       kať
SFX W   kať         čete       kať
SFX W   kať         ču         kať
SFX W   kať         čuc        kať
SFX W   kať         č          kať
SFX W   kať         čme        kať
SFX W   kať         čte        kať
SFX W   lať         eliem      lať
SFX W   lať         elieš      lať
SFX W   lať         elie       lať
SFX W   lať         elieme     lať
SFX W   lať         eliete     lať
SFX W   lať         elú        lať
SFX W   lať         elúc       lať
SFX W   lať         ľ          lať
SFX W   lať         eľme       lať
SFX W   lať         eľte       lať
SFX W   hnať        ženiem     hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženieš     hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženie      hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženieme    hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženiete    hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženú       hnať
SFX W   hnať        ženúc      hnať
SFX W   hnať        žeň        hnať
SFX W   hnať        žeňme      hnať
SFX W   hnať        žeňte      hnať
SFX W   ať          ajem       sať
SFX W   ať          aješ       sať
SFX W   ať          aje        sať
SFX W   ať          ajeme      sať
SFX W   ať          ajete      sať
SFX W   ať          ajú        sať
SFX W   ať          ajúc       sať
SFX W   ať          aj         sať
SFX W   ať          ajme       sať
SFX W   ať          ajte       sať
SFX W   ť           nem        tať
SFX W   ť           neš        tať
SFX W   ť           ne         tať
SFX W   ť           neme       tať
SFX W   ť           nete       tať
SFX W   ť           nú         tať
SFX W   ť           núc        tať
SFX W   ť           ň          tať
SFX W   ť           ňme        tať
SFX W   ť           ňte        tať
SFX W   ovať        ujem       ovať
SFX W   ovať        uješ       ovať
SFX W   ovať        uje        ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujeme      ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujete      ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujú        ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujúc       ovať
SFX W   ovať        uj         ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujme       ovať
SFX W   ovať        ujte       ovať
SFX W   uvať        ujem       uvať
SFX W   uvať        uješ       uvať
SFX W   uvať        uje        uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujeme      uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujete      uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujú        uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujúc       uvať
SFX W   uvať        uj         uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujme       uvať
SFX W   uvať        ujte       uvať
SFX W   ať          al         ať
SFX W   ať          ala        ať
SFX W   ať          alo        ať
SFX W   ať          ali        ať
SFX W   áť          ojím       áť
SFX W   áť          ojíš       áť
SFX W   áť          ojí        áť
SFX W   áť          ojíme      áť
SFX W   áť          ojíte      áť
SFX W   áť          oja        áť
SFX W   áť          ojac       áť
SFX W   áť          oj         áť
SFX W   áť          ojme       áť
SFX W   áť          ojte       áť
SFX W   áť          ál         áť
SFX W   áť          ála        áť
SFX W   áť          álo        áť
SFX W   áť          áli        áť
SFX W   ieť         ejem       ieť
SFX W   ieť         eješ       ieť
SFX W   ieť         eje        ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejeme      ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejete      ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejú        ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejúc       ieť
SFX W   ieť         ej         ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejme       ieť
SFX W   ieť         ejte       ieť
SFX W   ieť         el         ieť
SFX W   ieť         ela        ieť
SFX W   ieť         elo        ieť
SFX W   ieť         eli        ieť
SFX W   ť           jem        [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           ješ        [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           je         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           jeme       [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           jete       [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           jú         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           júc        [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           la         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           lo         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           li         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   iť          i          [bčdkľnprszž]iť
SFX W   yť          y          [bčdkľnprszž]yť
SFX W   ť           me         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           te         [bčdkľnprszž][iy]ť
SFX W   ť           jem        [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           ješ        [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           je         [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           jeme       [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           jete       [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           jú         [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           júc        [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           l          [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           la         [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           lo         [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           li         [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           j          [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           jme        [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   ť           jte        [bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          em         [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          eš         [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          e          [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          eme        [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          ete        [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          u          [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          uc         [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          i          [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          ite        [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   uť          ime        [^bčdkľprszž]uť
SFX W   nuť         ol         nuť
SFX W   nuť         la         nuť
SFX W   nuť         lo         nuť
SFX W   nuť         li         nuť
SFX W   úť          ujem       [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          uješ       [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          uje        [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujeme      [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujete      [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujú        [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujúc       [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          uj         [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujme       [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ujte       [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ul         [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ula        [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ulo        [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          uli        [bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          em         [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          eš         [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          e          [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          eme        [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ete        [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ú          [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          úc         [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          i          [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ite        [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   úť          ime        [^bčdkľrszž]úť
SFX W   núť         ol         [^aeilľory]núť
SFX W   núť         la         [^aeilľory]núť
SFX W   núť         lo         [^aeilľory]núť
SFX W   núť         li         [^aeilľory]núť
SFX W   úť          ul         [aeilľory]núť
SFX W   úť          ula        [aeilľory]núť
SFX W   úť          ulo        [aeilľory]núť
SFX W   úť          uli        [aeilľory]núť
